Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 4

Transportation

57-5-401. Transportation of beer and light alcoholic beverages into state — Documents required — Carrier's tax liability.

Any person engaged in transporting any beer and/or other such beverages from any point outside of this state to any point within this state shall possess during the entire time engaged in transporting such beverages in this state an invoice, bill of sale, or bill of lading, showing the true name and address of the consignor, the true name and address of the licensed brewery, wholesaler or distributor to whom such beverages are to be delivered, and the quantity of such beverages, except a common carrier maintaining a permanent office within this state where complete records of all beer and/or other such beverages transported from without this state are kept and open to inspection by the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized agent at all reasonable times.

When any common carrier transporting beer as defined in § 57-5-101(b) to a point within this state or any insurance company insuring such products comes into possession of such products by virtue of the same being damaged or otherwise unaccepted by the consignee of such product, such common carrier or insurance company shall become liable for the tax imposed under this chapter, unless proof deemed satisfactory to the commissioner is furnished to the commissioner by such carrier or insurance company showing that such products have been destroyed or shipped to a point without this state and, therefore, have not been sold or consumed in this state. The imposition of liability for the tax under the circumstances as hereinabove stated shall not be construed as authorizing the sale of such products in this state by either common carriers or insurance companies unless otherwise licensed to do so.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; 1973, ch. 6, § 2; T.C.A., § 57-224; Acts 1990, ch. 617, §§ 2, 3; 2014, ch. 861, § 11.

Cross-References. Beer wholesaler-supplier relations, title 57, ch. 5, part 5.

Interstate shipments by roadway or other means, §57-5-408.

57-5-402. Unauthorized change of consignee or place of delivery prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person to present or tender for transportation to any carrier, or to any officer, agent, employee, or other person acting or assuming to act for such carrier, any beer and/or other such beverages for delivery to any person other than the consignee designated by such person offering the same for shipment, or for the purpose of directly or indirectly effecting a delivery thereof to any person not permitted to receive the same as consignee thereof, under this part, or of any rule or regulation of the commissioner, or to any person not the actual bona fide consignee thereof.

It is also unlawful for any person through any such carrier to deliver any such beverages to any person, or at any point or place other than the person and/or destination designated in the bill of lading or transportation contract therefor, or to accept for transportation and/or delivery any shipment of such beverages knowing that such shipment is intended for any person not permitted to receive the same under this part or any rule or regulation of the commissioner.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-225.

Cross-References. Penalty for violating chapter, §57-5-303.

57-5-403. [Reserved.]

It is unlawful for any person to transport from any point within this state to another point within this state any beer and/or other such beverages on which the tax imposed in § 57-5-201 has not been paid, except for immediate delivery to a licensed brewery, wholesaler or distributor in this state.

Any person engaged in transporting any beer and/or other such beverages on which the tax imposed in § 57-5-201 has not been paid from any point within this state to another point within this state shall possess during the entire time engaged in transporting such beverages an invoice, bill of sale or bill of lading showing the true name and address of the consignor, the true name and address of the licensed brewery, wholesaler or distributor to whom such beverages are to be delivered and the quantity of such beverages by character and contents of the containers.

If such person fails to produce an invoice or bill of sale or recorded evidence, or if when produced it fails to comply and accurately disclose such information, the same shall be prima facie evidence of the violation of this chapter.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-227.

Cross-References. Penalty for violating chapter, §57-5-303.

57-5-405. Documents required by other than common carrier, brewery, wholesaler or distributor making deliveries to customer.

In order to assure that the tax provided herein has been paid, every person who shall possess or transport any such beverages within this state in excess of five gallons (5 gals.) (other than a common carrier or a licensed brewery, wholesaler or distributor engaged in making regular deliveries of beer and/or other such beverages to their customers) shall possess, during the entire time the person is in possession of or is engaged in transporting such beverages within this state, an invoice, bill of sale or bill of lading showing the date of purchase or shipment, the true name and exact address of the seller or consignor and the true name and exact address of the purchaser or consignee. The burden of proof shall be upon the person possessing or transporting any such beverages to establish to the satisfaction of the collection officers that the invoice, bill of sale or bill of lading possessed by the person and offered as evidence that the tax thereon has been paid does, in fact, relate to the identical beverages then possessed or being transported.

Any property confiscated as contraband solely for failure to have the documents required by this section may be returned upon order of the commissioner, without the necessity of a hearing, upon a showing satisfactory to the department of revenue that taxes imposed by the state of Tennessee upon such items have been paid.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; 1972, ch. 448, § 4; 1973, ch. 84, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-228.

57-5-406. No purchases authorized from unlicensed seller — Defenses — Shipping, receiving or accepting packages with false or misleading statements unlawful.

No person shall purchase or agree to purchase any beer and/or other such beverages from any person within this state who does not at the time of such purchase hold a license authorizing the seller to sell or agree to sell such beverages to such purchaser. It shall be a matter of defense only that such purchaser did not in good faith know that the seller did not hold a license authorizing the seller to sell or agree to sell beer to the purchaser, and did not have reasonable ground to believe that the seller did not hold such license.

No person shall solicit or receive any order for any such beverages in violation of this part, or give any information of how the same may be obtained in violation of this part.

It is unlawful for any consignee to accept or receive any package containing any beer upon which appears any statement, label, address, superscription, shipping directions, legend or design known to the consignee to be false or misleading, or for any carrier or other person to consign, ship, transport, or deliver any such package, knowing any such statement, label, address, superscription, shipping directions, legend or design to be false or misleading.

It is unlawful for any person to make a false statement for the purpose of obtaining any such beverages to any railroad, express or transportation company or any person engaged in the business of transporting goods, wares, and merchandise for the purpose of obtaining the shipment, transportation or delivery of any beer and/or other such beverages.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-229.

Cross-References. Penalty for violating chapter, §57-5-303.

57-5-407. Interstate shipments through Tennessee excepted from part.

This part shall not be construed as being applicable to interstate shipments through this state where such shipments are accompanied and supported by proper invoices or bills of lading containing such information as the commissioner may require.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-230.

57-5-408. Documents required for interstate shipment — Display and inspection.

It is unlawful for any person to transport into this state upon any public roadway or by any means whatever within this state any beer and/or other such beverages from any other state, nation or other territory unless the person accompanying and in charge of such shipment shall have present and available for exhibition such bills of lading, evidence of ownership and/or shipment as the commissioner may by rule or regulation require.

No such person or driver of any vehicle, vessel, or craft shall refuse to exhibit or refuse to permit to be read and/or examined any such bill of lading, evidence of ownership and/or shipment, or refuse to permit examination of the cargo or vehicular contents by an agent or employee of the commissioner or any police officer, highway patrol officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff or duly authorized officer of a municipal corporation within this state or governmental division thereof. Each, any and all of such officers are entitled to demand, examine and/or read the same, and a refusal to produce the documents referred to in this section or voluntarily permit examination of cargo or vehicular contents is a violation of this part.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-231.

Cross-References. Penalty for violating chapter, §57-5-303.

57-5-409. Contraband — What constitutes — Confiscation.

Any beer as defined in § 57-5-101(b) sold or offered for sale by, or in possession of, a retailer purchased from any person, firm or corporation, except a Tennessee wholesaler or distributor licensed in this state, is declared to be contraband and shall be subject to confiscation by the commissioner or any duly authorized representative, highway patrol officer, sheriff or other peace officer.

Any beer or other beverages described in § 57-5-101 imported into this state, in transit within this state, or in possession of a person or firm within this state not in accordance with any of the requirements of §§ 57-5-104 (except permit requirements on wholesalers in counties or cities in which they do not have an established location or place of business), 57-5-201, 57-5-206, 57-5-207, 57-5-401, 57-5-402, 57-5-404 — 57-5-406, 57-5-408 or 57-5-414 and the rules and regulations promulgated under them are declared to be contraband, and it, along with any vehicle in which it is being transported which is not a common carrier, may be seized, either with or without a warrant, by the commissioner or any duly authorized representative, highway patrolman, sheriff, or other peace officer. Any beer or other beverages or vehicles so seized shall be delivered promptly to the department for disposition.

Any beer so seized may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be deposited with a duly licensed Tennessee wholesaler or distributor, located nearest to the site of the seizure, engaged in handling the particular brand of beer involved. Such deposit shall be evidenced by a receipt issued to the commissioner by such wholesaler or distributor, stating the quantity and brand name of such beer so deposited. The receipt may subsequently be exchanged with the wholesaler or distributor issuing it for salable beer of the same quantity and brand name by any person or persons who may be entitled thereto or to the proceeds of the sale thereof in accordance with this chapter. Such receipts shall be admissible as evidence in any administrative hearing or any civil or criminal court hearing or trial.

If, incidental to a confiscation of contraband as defined herein, there is discovered any intoxicating liquor deemed to be held or transported illegally within the purview of § 57-3-411, § 57-9-201 or § 57-9-202, the confiscating officer is hereby empowered and required to seize such liquor, notwithstanding the fact that such officer may not otherwise be empowered to take such action under such section. Any intoxicating liquor seized pursuant hereto shall be delivered promptly, as provided by § 57-3-411, § 57-9-201 or § 57-9-202, whichever is appropriate, to the alcoholic beverage commission for sale or disposition as contraband in accordance with chapters 2-4, or 6 of this title, whichever is appropriate.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; 1970, ch. 388, § 1; 1973, ch. 68, § 3; 1974, ch. 478, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-232; Acts 2014, ch. 861, § 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 3, 20.

57-5-410. Notification of seizure — Claims.

Upon confiscation, or as soon thereafter as practicable, written notice shall be given by the department of revenue to the person from whom the confiscation was made and to all others with a legal interest in the property confiscated who are either made known to the department or who, by reasonable examination of public records of titles and liens, should have been discovered. Such written notice shall state: a description of the property confiscated, the reason for confiscation, the method for seeking recovery, the time limit for seeking recovery, and the result of failure to seek or obtain recovery by the designated method. Such notice may be by personal delivery or by mail either of which may be made to the last known address of the interested party.

Any person claiming any property so seized as contraband goods may, within ten (10) days of such notice, and after executing a bond for costs with one (1) or more good and solvent sureties in the sum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) made payable to the state of Tennessee, or upon executing a pauper's oath as provided by law, file with the commissioner at Nashville a claim in writing requesting a hearing and stating the person's interest in the property seized. The commissioner shall set a date for hearing within ten (10) days from the date the claim is posted or received.

In any hearing convened upon proper petition of an interested party, the initial burden shall be upon the state to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the property in question was of such nature or was used in such manner as to be declared as contraband. Upon meeting this burden, the property shall be forfeited as provided by law unless the claimant shall prove that the claimant is nevertheless qualified under this chapter, or otherwise, to recover the property in question.

Whenever in any proceeding under this section a claim is filed for any vehicle, aircraft or boat seized, as hereinabove provided, the commissioner shall not allow the claim unless and until the claimant proves that:

The claimant has an interest in such vehicle, aircraft or boat, as owner or otherwise, which was acquired in good faith;

The claimant had at no time any knowledge or reason to believe that it was being or would be used in the violation of laws of the United States or of this state relating to beer as defined in § 57-5-101(b); and

If it appears that the interest asserted by the claimant arises out of or is in any way subject to any contract or agreement under which any person having a record or reputation for violating laws of the United States or any state relating to beer as defined in § 57-5-101(b) has a right with respect to such vehicle, aircraft or boat, that before such claimant acquired the interest, or such other person acquired the right under such contract or agreement, whichever occurred later, the claimant, claimant's officer or agent, made inquiry and was informed, in answer to the inquiry at the headquarters of the sheriff, chief of police, principal federal internal revenue officer engaged in the enforcement of the beer laws, or other principal local or federal law enforcement officer of the locality in which such other person acquired the right under such contract or agreement, of the locality in which such other person then resided, and of each locality in which the claimant has made any other inquiry as to the character or financial standing of such other person, that such other person had no such record or reputation.

Provided, however, that in the case of a first offense of violating this chapter, and after hearing provided for herein, subdivision (d)(1) may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be waived and claim of owner or lienholder may be honored.

The commissioner may designate a hearing officer from the department to conduct the hearings provided for in this section, who shall make findings of fact, conclusions of law, and proposed orders based thereon. If the commissioner concurs, the commissioner shall issue the order; or the commissioner may, upon review of the record, make such findings, conclusions, and issue such orders as, in the commissioner's discretion, the record justifies.

Pending any proceeding to recover any beer as defined in § 57-5-101(b) and/or any vehicle seized as contraband under this chapter, or pending any appeal of the action taken by the commissioner as a result of any such proceeding, the commissioner may order delivery thereof to any claimant who shall establish the right to immediate possession thereof, and who shall execute, with one (1) or more sureties approved by the commissioner, and deliver to the commissioner, a bond in favor of the state of Tennessee for the payment of a sum double the appraised value thereof as of the time of the seizure. The condition of the bond shall be that the obligors shall pay to the state, through the department, the full value of the goods or property when seized, unless upon a final determination by the commissioner or the courts the property shall be awarded to the claimant. The full value of the goods or property seized shall be determined by the commissioner and such determination shall be presumed to be correct in the absence of any proof to the contrary being submitted by the claimant.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; 1970, ch. 578, § 2; 1971, ch. 213, § 1; 1973, ch. 84, § 2; T.C.A., § 57-233; Acts 2014, ch. 861, §§ 13-15.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Department of Revenue and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (Mike Norton), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 303.

57-5-411. Disposition of seized property — Application of proceeds — Taxes paid before delivery of property.

In the event the ruling of the commissioner is favorable to the claimant, the commissioner shall deliver to the claimant the property so seized. If the ruling is adverse to the claimant, or if a hearing is not applied for in writing within the ten (10) days following notice, and the commissioner determines the products to be salable, the commissioner is authorized to order sale of the property in the manner as herein provided, applying the proceeds from the sale first to the costs incurred in the seizure and sale of such articles and the balance, if any, to the state general fund, to be apportioned as tax under § 57-5-205. In the case of any contraband property seized by any law enforcement officer of any incorporated municipality or of any county and turned over by them to the department for confiscation, there shall be paid to the municipality or to the county served by such officer fifty percent (50%) of the net proceeds thereof. Any such beer, other beverages or vehicles so seized and ordered sold by the commissioner shall be sold at public sale by the department of general services, and the procedure to be followed shall be the same as now authorized by law under § 67-4-1021. It shall be incumbent upon the commissioner to notify a Tennessee distributor handling the same brand(s) of beer and/or other such beverages as that seized of such seizure and impending sale. All confiscated beer, suitable for sale at retail, shall first be offered for sale to the Tennessee wholesaler located nearest the site of the seizure engaged in handling the particular brand of beer involved at the same per case price (state beer barrelage tax included) that the wholesaler would be required to pay for such beer at the brewery. All confiscated beer “suitable for sale at retail” not purchased within ten (10) days by the Tennessee wholesaler, after being notified that such beer had been confiscated and was being offered for sale to such wholesaler, then shall be sold at public sale by the department of general services.

The seventeen percent (17%) wholesale beer tax as authorized in § 57-6-103 shall be added to the public sale price and the funds derived shall be remitted to the city in which the public sale is held. “Suitable for sale at retail” is determined by the commissioner.

The commissioner, before delivering any seized property to the successful bidder, shall require any tax due thereon to be paid to the department of revenue. Any seized beer or other beverages not sold within ninety (90) days following hearing, or declared to be unsalable by the commissioner, shall be destroyed by the commissioner in a manner which the commissioner may prescribe.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; 1972, ch. 448, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 68, § 8; T.C.A., § 57-234.

57-5-412. Costs and fees of hearing.

Costs incurred in each hearing, including witness fees, mileage expenses and all fees of sheriffs for serving any notices or subpoenas, shall be taxed as costs by the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative. All costs and fees for witnesses and/or sheriffs shall be advanced or collected as provided in the case of witnesses attending upon cases in courts of record, and the service of subpoenas requiring their attendance and testimony.

If, upon the hearing, the claimant shall be found by the commissioner, or the commissioner's authorized representative, to be guilty of the matters charged, all of the costs provided for in subsection (a) shall be taxed and charged against the claimant, but if the charge against such claimant shall be dismissed, then such costs shall be paid by the commissioner out of the funds collected under this chapter, after approval by the commissioner, and shall be and constitute lawful expenditures hereunder.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-235.

57-5-413. Review of action of commissioner.

Any action of the commissioner shall be reviewable by a petition for a common-law writ of certiorari in the chancery or circuit court of the county in which the offense occurred, which petition shall be filed within ten (10) days from the date of such action. Immediately upon the grant of the writ of certiorari, the commissioner shall cause to be made, certified and forwarded to the court a complete transcript of the proceedings in the cause, which shall contain all the proof submitted before the commissioner. The decision of the commissioner shall be reviewed solely upon the pleadings and transcript of the proceedings before the commissioner, and neither party shall be entitled to introduce any additional evidence in the court. The scope of any review proceedings involving persons already licensed as Tennessee beer wholesalers under this chapter shall be governed by §57-5-108 instead of the procedure set forth herein.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; 1973, ch. 84, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-236.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Department of Revenue and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (Mike Norton), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 303.

57-5-414. Inspection of products, records, documents and premises — Violation.

Every distributor or dealer in beer or other such beverages shall permit the commissioner, or the commissioner's authorized agent or representative, to inspect at any time all products, invoices, books, papers and memoranda as may be deemed necessary by the commissioner in ascertaining whether or not the tax levied under this chapter has been paid, or in determining the amount of such tax due. No licensed distributor or dealer shall be permitted to claim any part of the premises whereon the business was conducted to be exempt from inspection as being the licensed distributor's or dealer's dwelling or home, the application for certificate of registration under this chapter being declared an express waiver of such claim. All persons failing to permit the examination of such products, invoices, books and other memoranda, including the general books, both operating and proprietary ledgers, etc., or interfering with the orderly inspection or examination thereof, or failing to file such reports as may be required by the commissioner, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-237.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor penalty provisions in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§39-11-114,40-35-110,40-35-111.

Cross-References. Penalty for violating chapter, §57-5-303.

57-5-415. Enforcement authorities.

Any duly authorized representative, agent or employee of the department of revenue who has been designated by the commissioner to enforce this chapter is authorized and empowered to execute search warrants and do all acts incident thereto, in the same manner as search warrants may be levied by sheriffs and other peace officers. Inspectors, agents, representatives or officers appointed by the commissioner shall be cloaked with and have the duty, power and authority as a police officer to enforce the revenue provisions of this chapter and in the illegal traffic of untaxed beer products. The highway patrol shall likewise have concurrent authority to assist in the enforcement of this chapter and in the illegal traffic of untaxed beer products.

Any duly authorized representative or employee of the department who has been specifically designated by the commissioner to enforce § 57-5-409 is hereby authorized and empowered to go armed or carry a pistol while on active duty engaged in enforcing § 57-5-409.

Acts 1969, ch. 299, § 3; 1970, ch. 578, § 3; 1971, ch. 288, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-238.

57-5-416. Storage at location other than specific retail location for which purchased unlawful.

In order to facilitate the effective collection and enforcement by municipal and county officials of the tax levied by §57-6-103 on all sales of beer by wholesalers to retailers or any other persons, it shall be unlawful for any retailer to store beer purchased for a specific retail location at any place other than that specific retail location.

Acts 1971, ch. 21, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-239; Acts 2018, ch. 933, § 4.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the section which read: “Unless authorized in writing by the appropriate county, municipal or metropolitan beer board or committee to do so, it is unlawful for any retailer to store beer at any place other than the address designated on the retailers' beer permit.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 933, § 7. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Penalty for violating chapter, §57-5-303.